Utah statutes.
53A-1-603.5.   Unique student identifier -- Coordination of higher education
and public education information technology systems.
(1)  As used in this section, "unique student identifier" means an
alphanumeric code assigned to each public education student for identification
purposes, which:
(a)  is not assigned to any former or current student; and
(b)  does not incorporate personal information, including a birth date or
Social Security number.
(2)  The State Board of Education, through the superintendent of public
instruction, shall assign each public education student a unique student
identifier, which shall be used to track individual student performance on
achievement tests administered under this part.
(3)  The State Board of Education and the State Board of Regents shall
coordinate public education and higher education information technology
systems to allow individual student academic achievement to be tracked through
both education systems in accordance with this section and Section 53B-1-109.
(4)  The State Board of Education and State Board of Regents shall coordinate
access to the unique student identifier of a public education student who
later attends an institution within the state system of higher education.
